Massachusetts, session 194th, H349.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a special legislative commission established pursuant to
section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws to examine repealing restrictions on the offer and
sale of discounted alcoholic beverages by persons licensed pursuant to chapter 138 of the
General Laws.
(b) The special legislative commission shall consist of: the house and senate chairs of the
joint committee on community development and small businesses, who shall serve as co-chairs;
1 member of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; 1 member of the senate, to be appointed by the senate president; 1 person with
experience or expertise related to alcohol licensing, to be appointed by the governor; 4 members
of geographically-diverse business improvement districts, as defined in section 1 of chapter 40O
of the General Laws, main streets organizations or chambers of commerce, jointly appointed by
the co-chairs; the president and chief executive officer of The Massachusetts Restaurant
of 2

Association, Inc. or their designee; 1 person with industry expertise in alcohol distribution,
jointly appointed by the co-chairs; 1 member of Massachusetts Citizens for Happy Hour; and the
executive director of the Massachusetts affiliate of Mothers Against Drunk Driving or their
designee.
(c) The special legislative commission shall: (i) review and evaluate state and federal
laws, regulations and legal advisories regarding the promotion and discounted sale of alcoholic
beverages, including those in the state of Illinois; (ii) analyze how changes to the Massachusetts
laws might aid restaurants and bars in their economic recovery from the effects of the COVID-19
pandemic; (iii) examine how any proposed changes may be enacted with a primary focus on
public safety, including but not limited to the incorporation of ride sharing services and other
technology, messaging and training; (iv) assess changing trends in the workplace, including the
likelihood of expanded “work-from-home” policies and how current trends may impact future
business patterns at restaurants and bars; (v) consider the needs of different regions of the
commonwealth and different types of restaurants and bars within the context of the overall
hospitality industry; and (vi) assess the potential impacts casinos have on the alcohol sales of
nearby restaurant and bar.
(d) Not later than April 1, 2026, the commission shall submit a report of its findings,
including recommendations for legislation, if any, with the clerks of the house of representatives
and the senate.
of 2